Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF734.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATIONS; SUPPLEMENTAL NONPROFIT SECURITY GRANTS.new text end new text begin $....... in fiscal year 2026 and $....... in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of public safety for supplemental nonprofit security grants under this section. Nonprofit organizations whose applications for funding through the Federal Emergency Management Agency's nonprofit security grant program have been approved by the Division of Homeland Security and Emergency Management are eligible for grants under this section. No additional application shall be required for grants under this section, and an application for a grant from the federal program is also an application for funding from the state supplemental program. Eligible organizations may receive grants of up to $75,000, except that the total received by any individual from both the federal nonprofit security grant program and the state supplemental nonprofit security grant program shall not exceed $75,000. Grants shall be awarded in an order consistent with the ranking given to applicants for the federal nonprofit security grant program. No grants under the state supplemental nonprofit security grant program shall be awarded until the announcement of the recipients and the amount of the grants awarded under the federal nonprofit security grant program. The commissioner may use up to one percent of the appropriation received under this section to pay costs incurred by the department in administering the supplemental nonprofit security grant program. new text end